Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 16 Motor Vehicle Franchises
§ 31-16-118.
Repair or replacement of an odometer.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit the service, repair or replacement of an odometer, provided the indicated mileage remains the same as before the service, repair or replacement. Where the odometer is incapable of registering the same mileage as before the service, repair or replacement, the odometer shall be adjusted to read zero and a notice shall be attached permanently to the left door frame of the vehicle by the owner or his agent specifying the mileage prior to repair or replacement of the odometer and the date on which it was repaired or replaced. No person shall fail to adjust an odometer or affix a notice regarding that adjustment, as required under this section. No person shall with intent to defraud remove or alter any notice affixed to a vehicle under this section.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

§ 31-16-119.
Disconnecting, turning back or resetting of odometer prohibited.

No person shall disconnect, turn back, or reset the odometer of any vehicle with the intent to reduce the number of miles indicated on the odometer gauge.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

§ 31-16-120.
Selling vehicle knowing odometer turned back unlawful.

No person shall sell a vehicle in this state if he has knowledge that the odometer on the vehicle has been turned back unless he notifies the buyer prior to the time of the sale that the odometer has been turned back or that he has reason to believe that the odometer has been turned back.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

§ 31-16-121.
Selling vehicle knowing odometer replaced unlawful.

No person shall sell a vehicle in this state if he has knowledge that the odometer on the vehicle has been replaced with another odometer unless he notifies the buyer prior to the time of the sale that the odometer has been replaced or that he believes the odometer to have been replaced.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

§ 31-16-122.
Selling, advertising, using or installing device which causes other than true mileage to be registered.

No person shall advertise for sale, sell, use or install on any part of a vehicle or on an odometer in a vehicle, any device which causes the odometer to register any mileage other than the true mileage driven. For the purposes of this section, the true mileage driven is that driven by the vehicle as registered by the odometer within the manufacturer’s designed tolerance.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

§ 31-16-123.
Purchaser plaintiff to recover costs and attorney's fees.

The purchaser of a vehicle may recover from the seller of the vehicle court costs and reasonable attorney fees fixed by the court, if:

The suit or claim is based substantially upon the purchaser’s allegation that the odometer on the vehicle has been tampered with contrary to this act or replaced contrary to this act; and

It is found in such suit that the seller of the vehicle or any of his employees or agents knew or had reason to know the odometer on the vehicle had been tampered with or replaced and failed to disclose the knowledge to the purchaser prior to the time of sale.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in subsection (a)(i), see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

§ 31-16-124.
Applicability of provisions.

Any person who engages directly or indirectly in purposeful contacts within this state in connection with the offering or advertising for sale or has business dealings with respect to a new vehicle sale within this state is subject to this act and is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

The applicability of this act is not affected by a choice of law clause in any franchise, agreement, waiver, novation or other written instrument.

Any provision of any agreement, franchise, waiver, novation or other written instrument which is in violation of any section of this act is null and void and without force and effect.

No manufacturer or other franchisor shall use any subsidiary corporation, affiliated corporation or any other controlled corporation, partnership, association or person to accomplish what would otherwise be illegal conduct under this act on the part of the manufacturer.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to impair the obligations of a contract entered into prior to the date this act becomes effective or to prevent a manufacturer, distributor, representative or any other person, whether or not licensed under this act, from requiring performance of the prior written contract entered into with any licensee nor shall the requirement of that performance constitute a violation of this act if the contract, or the terms thereof, requiring performance, was freely entered into and executed between the contracting parties. This act applies to any amendments, novations, records or modifications of prior contracts and to any contracts entered into subsequent to the date this act becomes effective.

Any assignment or delegation by a manufacturer or other franchisor, except an assignment or delegation agreed to by the affected new vehicle dealer does not relieve the manufacturer or other franchisor of liability for performance of obligations under any franchise agreement or in any way limit the application of this act to the manufacturer or other franchisor.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 4, makes the act effective on June 9, 1988.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

§ 31-16-125.
Demo, full use, and manufacturer license plates.

Any licensed dealer who sells or exchanges retail twelve (12) or more vehicles in any twelve (12) consecutive month period shall apply to the county treasurer in the county in which the business is licensed for demo and full use license plates. After presentation of a current dealer’s license and payment of fees, the treasurer shall assign the requested number of plates to an approved applicant for use in the business located in the county. The treasurer shall not assign plates to a dealer in excess of the number approved by the department.

The department shall authorize any licensed dealer who sells or exchanges retail twelve (12) or more vehicles in any one (1) calendar year to purchase the following number of demo license plates annually:

If the dealer applied for a renewal certificate based on the total number of retail sales by the dealer during the twelve (12) full calendar months preceding the date of application for renewal:

Three (3) demo plates plus one (1) demo plate for each twenty-five (25) retail vehicle sales or fractional part thereof for the first one thousand (1,000) retail vehicle sales;

One (1) demo plate for each fifty (50) retail vehicle sales or fractional portion thereof from one thousand one (1,001) through one thousand five hundred (1,500) retail vehicle sales;

One (1) demo plate for each one hundred (100) retail vehicle sales or fractional portion thereof in excess of one thousand five hundred (1,500) retail vehicle sales;

In addition to demo plates otherwise authorized under this paragraph, one (1) plate for each four (4) retail vehicle sales or fractional part thereof if the vehicle is a truck with an unladen weight greater than six thousand (6,000) pounds or a recreational vehicle;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 64, § 2.

If the dealer applied for a new dealer license, he may purchase demo plates in the same amount specified in paragraph (i) of this subsection, except authorization to purchase demo license plates shall be based on the dealer’s reasonable estimate of the number of retail vehicle sales the dealer will make during the first year of business. The department may revise the estimate and reduce or increase the number of demo license plates authorized under this paragraph at any time, but not less than ninety (90) days after the certificate is issued if, from the number of retail sales made, it appears the estimate is substantially inaccurate. No dealer shall hold demo or full use license plates in excess of the number authorized. No refund shall be granted for demo or full use license plates returned under this paragraph.

The department shall authorize and the county treasurer upon application and payment of the fees shall assign one (1) demo plate to any dealer selling fewer than twelve (12) vehicles per calendar year.

The department shall authorize a licensed dealer to purchase full use license plates not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total number of demo plates allowed by subsection (b) of this section.

A banking or lending institution engaged in the business of making loans secured by vehicles, or persons engaged in the business of repossessing vehicles, may acquire demo or full use license plates after presentation of a current dealer’s license and upon payment of fees required by dealers and may use the demo or full use license plates solely for the repossession and sale of vehicles.

Licensed Wyoming based manufacturers may apply to the department for one (1) or more manufacturer license plates, or, if the department authorizes, to the county treasurer in a county where the manufacturer has an established place of business. After presentation of a current manufacturer certificate and payment of fees, the department or treasurer, if authorized, shall assign to the manufacturer the number of license plates approved by the department for use in the usual and customary conduct of the manufacturer’s business including, demonstrating, testing, transporting or selling a vehicle.

Licensed dealers who have received demo license plates may apply for and receive temporary license permits from the department upon payment of fees.

The department may authorize a dealer to purchase demo license plates in addition to the number authorized under subsection (b) of this section upon a showing of a substantial increase in the dealer’s business or for other good cause shown.

Every dealer or manufacturer upon transferring a vehicle by sale, lease or otherwise to any person other than a dealer or manufacturer shall immediately give written notice of the transfer to the department upon the official form provided by the department. The notice shall contain the date of the transfer, the names and addresses of the transferor and transferee, and a description of the vehicles required on the form.

Licensed direct sale manufacturers may apply to the department for one (1) or more manufacturer license plates. After presentation of a current direct sale manufacturer license and payment of fees, the department shall assign to the direct sale manufacturer the number of license plates approved by the department for use in the usual and customary conduct of the manufacturer’s business including, demonstrating, testing, transporting or selling a vehicle.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 1; 2005, ch. 159, § 1; 2017 ch. 208, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 64, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), rewrote the first sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (k).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, repealed (b)(i)(E), which read, “One (1) demo plate if the applicant is an antique vehicle dealer.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-16-126.
Use of demo, full use plates; temporary permits.

Vehicles while included as a part of a licensed dealer’s inventory may be operated on highways with demo license plates issued pursuant to W.S.

31-16-125

, provided that:

Demo plates may only be displayed on vehicles owned by or consigned to the dealership;

Notwithstanding paragraph (v) of this subsection, a dealer demo plate may only be used on a vehicle operated by a prospective buyer, by a dealership employee with a prospective buyer in the vehicle, or for conducting legitimate dealership business by a dealership employee during normal business hours and for no other purpose except as authorized by the department for good cause shown;

A dealer demo plate may not be used on any vehicle which has been sold and is in the possession of the purchaser, or upon any vehicle leased or rented by a dealer;

A demonstration by a prospective buyer cannot exceed seven (7) calendar days;

Owners and employees of the dealership may not operate a vehicle with demo plates for their private purposes or use a demo plate for commercial purposes except as provided by this section;

Demo plates cannot be displayed on any of the following vehicles owned by the dealership which shall be titled and registered in the name of the dealership:

Tow vehicles;

Parts and delivery vehicles;

Service department loaners;

Courtesy shuttle vehicles;

Rental vehicles; and

Haulers.

Except as authorized by the department for good cause shown, a dealer demo plate shall not be loaned to charitable organizations, parades or shows;

A dealer demo plate shall not be loaned or given to any person other than prospective buyers for demonstration purposes;

Demo plates shall be designated by “DEMO” above or below the plate numbers;

The number of demo plates issued to a dealer shall be subject to W.S.

31-16-125

.

Vehicles while included as a part of a licensed dealer’s inventory may be operated on highways with full use license plates issued pursuant to W.S.

31-16-125

provided that full use license plates:

Shall be designated by “FULL USE” above or below the plate numbers;

Shall be limited to no more than fifty percent (50%) of a dealer’s allotted demo plates;

Shall be valid for one (1) year;

May be used only on vehicles owned and offered for sale by the dealer. Full use plates shall not be used on vehicles owned by the dealership that are commonly used by that dealer as tow trucks, parts vehicles, rental vehicles, courtesy shuttles or haulers;

May be transferred from one (1) vehicle to another freely and without notification to the department;

May be assigned by a vehicle dealer to the following persons:

Owner or co-owners;

Employees;

To any person including former, current and prospective customers in order to serve the legitimate business interests of the dealership;

A spouse living in the same household as the licensed dealer.

A vehicle dealer may not use a demo, full use or manufacturer license plate on any vehicle type the dealer is not licensed to sell, as indicated on the dealer’s application for a dealer license. No demo, full use, direct sale manufacturer or Wyoming based manufacturer license plate shall be used upon any vehicle rented, or leased by a dealer, direct sale manufacturer or Wyoming based manufacturer or upon a wrecker or delivery truck used by a dealer, direct sale manufacturer or Wyoming based manufacturer, except that a demo, full use or Wyoming based manufacturer license plate may be used on a vehicle lawfully being repossessed by a dealer, direct sale manufacturer or Wyoming based manufacturer. A demo, full use or manufacturer license plate for trailers may be used on a trailer being used by a dealer or Wyoming based manufacturer to transport a boat if the boat:

Is being transported for the purpose of demonstration or sale; and

Is included in the dealer’s or manufacturer’s inventory.

Vehicles may be operated without registration for sixty (60) days from the date of purchase when displaying a temporary license permit issued by a licensed dealer or the department. The form and display of the temporary license permit shall be prescribed by the department.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 1; 2015 ch. 31, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 208, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cited

in

State ex rel. DOT v. Legarda, 2003 WY 130, 77 P.3d 708,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2003).

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in (d), substituted “sixty (60) days” for “forty-five (45) days.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (c) added “direct sale manufacturer” three times in the second sentence.

§ 31-16-127.
Temporary recreational vehicle display and sales permit.

No out of state recreational vehicle dealer shall display, demonstrate, exchange or sell a recreational vehicle, as defined in W.S. 31-16-101(a)(xxiii), in this state without a permit as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

The department shall issue a temporary recreational vehicle display and sales permit to an out of state recreational vehicle dealer not currently licensed in Wyoming, subject to the following conditions:

The applicant shall submit an application accompanied by an application fee of five hundred dollars ($500.00) to the department at least ninety (90) days prior to the recreational vehicle display and sales event. The application shall be on a form approved by the department and shall include:

The legal name and residence address of the applicant and the trade name, if any, under which the applicant intends to conduct his business. If the applicant is a partnership, the name and residence address of its managing partner, whether a limited or general partner, and the name under which the partnership business is to be conducted. If the applicant is a corporation, the name of the corporation and the name and address of its principal officer. If the applicant is a limited liability company, the name and address of the managing members;

Any other information the department may reasonably require, including financial statements of new applicants, past or present judicial, civil or administrative dispositions of criminal, civil or administrative actions relating to the conduct of the business if currently licensed or a new applicant, telephone numbers, sales and use tax numbers for the business and declared business hours. Any new applicant for a permit issued under this section shall submit to fingerprinting and provide information necessary for a state and national criminal history record background check and release of information as provided in W.S. 7-19-106(k)(ii) and consent to the release of any criminal history information to the department;

An indication whether the applicant wishes to purchase one (1) or two (2) temporary recreational vehicle demo plates for an additional fee as set forth in W.S. 31-3-102(a)(v);

An indication whether the applicant wishes to purchase a minimum order as set forth in department rules for an additional fee established in accordance with W.S. 31-3-102(a)(x) of temporary permits for issuance to purchasers of recreational vehicles at the event;

Any additional fees required by state and federal agencies for processing of criminal history record information and fingerprint searches.

The applicant is a licensed recreational vehicle dealer in its state of residence;

The recreational vehicle display and sales event is in conjunction with a state, regional or national recreational vehicle rally at which at least one hundred fifty (150) owned units are preregistered to attend;

The application shall be accompanied by a written statement from the owner or manager of the location where the recreational vehicle display and sales event will be conducted, describing the associated recreational vehicle rally and the display and sales event;

The owner or manager of the location where the recreational vehicle display and sales event will be conducted shall notify all licensed Wyoming recreational vehicle dealers when a temporary recreational vehicle display and sales event is planned. Notice shall be timely, but not less than six (6) months prior to the event;

Wyoming licensed dealers shall have a first right of refusal to purchase space for the purpose of displaying and selling recreational vehicles, exercisable for three (3) months following the date of the notice required by paragraph (v) of this subsection, at any event for which a permit is required under this section;

Wyoming licensed recreational vehicle dealers holding a current exclusive franchise or dealer agreement with a recreational vehicle manufacturer shall have the first right of refusal to be the sole representative for that manufacturer, as provided in the exclusive franchise or dealer agreement;

Recreational vehicle dealers in a state allowing sales by out of state recreational vehicle dealers on terms substantially equal to those provided for in this section shall have a second right of refusal to purchase space for the purpose of displaying and selling recreational vehicles, exercisable for one (1) month following expiration of the first right of refusal provided by paragraph (vi) of this subsection, at any event for which a permit is required under this section;

A permit pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period up to seven (7) consecutive days, beginning on the first day of the scheduled event;

Not more than three (3) permits as provided in this section shall be issued to any one (1) out of state recreational vehicle dealer in one (1) calendar year;

The application shall be accompanied by a cash or surety bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) with a corporate surety duly licensed to do business within this state. The bond shall:

Be approved as to form by the attorney general;

Be conditioned that the applicant shall not practice any fraud, make fraudulent misrepresentations, or violate any federal or state law, rules or regulations relating to the conduct of the business;

Guarantee the return of the temporary recreational vehicle display and sales permit, recreational vehicle demo plates, unused temporary permits and stubs of temporary permits issued to purchasers;

Be forfeited to the department upon any violation of this act;

Be returned by the department to the bond holder within thirty (30) days after the last day of the event if no sales were consummated in Wyoming, or one (1) year after the last date of any sales transacted at the event if all conditions and guarantees of the bond have been met.

The permit shall be prominently displayed at the sales event in the location where the permit holder conducts business;

Out of state dealers at a temporary recreational vehicle sales and display event, prior to consummation of a vehicle sale to a Wyoming resident, shall provide written notice to the buyer of the location of the manufacturer authorized service facility nearest to the event.

For purposes of this section:

“Out of state recreational vehicle dealer” means a dealer as defined in W.S. 31-16-101(a)(xviii) who is engaged in the business of selling or exchanging recreational vehicles and who is not licensed as a new vehicle dealer or used vehicle dealer as provided in this act;

“Recreational vehicle display and sales event” means any temporary private or public assembly of recreational vehicles at which recreational vehicles are displayed to the public for the purpose of sale or exchange.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 80, § 1; 2021 ch. 64, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (b)(i)(C), substituted "indication whether the applicant wishes to purchase one (1) or" for "additional fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for," added "for an additional fee as set forth in W.S. 31-3-102(a)(v)"; and substituted "indication whether the applicant wishes to purchase a minimum order as set forth in department rules for an additional fee established in accordance with W.S. 31 3 102(a)(x) of" for "additional fee of five dollars ($5.00) for ten (10)" in (b)(i)(D).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 80, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.